Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [93.005] NONFERROUS SULFIDE ORE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW, PERMITS, LICENSES, AND LEASES; BAD ACTORS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Disclosure statement. new text end new text begin (a) A person subject to environmental review relating to a proposed nonferrous sulfide ore project or a person submitting an application to obtain, renew, assign, modify, amend, or transfer a permit, license, or lease needed to mine nonferrous sulfide ore under this chapter or other chapters administered by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency must submit a disclosure statement according to paragraph (b) to the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency, as applicable, before beginning to prepare the environmental assessment worksheet, environmental impact statement, or environmental review or when the application is submitted. new text end new text begin (b) A disclosure statement must include: new text end new text begin (1) in the case of an individual, the full name and business address of the individual; new text end new text begin (2) in the case of a business: new text end new text begin (i) the full name and business address of any officers, directors, partners, or key employees of the business; new text end new text begin (ii) the full name and business address of all individuals or entities holding equity in or debt liability of the business or, if the business is a publicly traded corporation, all individuals or entities holding more than five percent of the equity in or debt liability of the business; and new text end new text begin (iii) the full name and business address of any parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of the business; new text end new text begin (3) the full name and business address of all officers, directors, or partners of any business disclosed in the statement and the names and addresses of all individuals or entities holding equity in or debt liability of any disclosed business or, if the business is a publicly traded corporation, all individuals or entities holding more than five percent of the equity in or debt liability of the business; new text end new text begin (4) a listing and explanation of any charge, indictment, conviction, or settlement for violating a state, federal, Tribal, or foreign environmental or natural resources law or regulation related to mining against a person identified under clauses (1) to (3) in the 15 years immediately preceding submission of the disclosure statement; new text end new text begin (5) a listing and explanation of any consent decree, consent agreement and final order, stipulated penalty, administrative order on consent, or nonmonetary sanctions in connection with a civil administrative action or civil judicial action for violating an environmental or natural resources law or regulation against a person identified under clauses (1) to (3) in the 15 years immediately preceding submission of the disclosure statement; new text end new text begin (6) a listing and explanation of any charge, indictment, conviction, or settlement for violating a state, federal, Tribal, or foreign law against bribery or corruption, including but not limited to the federal Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, against a person identified under clauses (1) to (3) in the 15 years immediately preceding submission of the disclosure statement; new text end new text begin (7) a listing and explanation of any civil or administrative sanctions or fines for noncompliance with environmental laws and regulations, Occupational Safety and Health Administration laws or regulations, or the federal Foreign Corrupt Practices Act levied against a person identified under clauses (1) to (3) in the 15 years immediately preceding submission of the disclosure statement, including the amount of each sanction or fine; and new text end new text begin (8) any other information the commissioner and the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency may require that relates to the competency, reliability, or good character of the applicant. new text end new text begin (c) If any information required to be included in a disclosure statement changes after an applicant submits a disclosure statement or if the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency requires additional information after an applicant submits a disclosure statement, the applicant must provide the information to the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency in writing no later than 30 days after the change or request for additional information. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited actions. new text end new text begin (a) To protect the public health and safety and the environment of the state, the commissioner and the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency are prohibited from conducting environmental review relating to proposed nonferrous sulfide ore projects and must not issue, renew, assign, approve, modify, amend, or transfer a permit, license, or lease to mine nonferrous sulfide ore under this chapter or other chapters administered by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to an applicant that: new text end new text begin (1) in the last 15 years has been, or whose employees have been, charged, indicted, or convicted of violating a state, federal, Tribal, or foreign environmental or natural resources law or regulation; new text end new text begin (2) is party to or the subject of a consent decree, consent agreement and final order, stipulated penalty, administrative order on consent, or nonmonetary sanctions entered in the last 15 years in connection with a civil administrative action or civil judicial action for violating an environmental or natural resources law or regulation; new text end new text begin (3) in the last 15 years, has been charged, indicted, or convicted of violating a state, federal, Tribal, or foreign law against bribery or corruption, including but not limited to the federal Foreign Corrupt Practices Act; new text end new text begin (4) in the last 15 years, has been caused to pay civil or administrative sanctions or fines for noncompliance with state, federal, Tribal, or foreign environmental or natural resources laws or regulations in excess of, collectively, $1,000,000; new text end new text begin (5) in the last 15 years, has entered into a settlement resolving claims of violating a state, federal, Tribal, or foreign environmental or natural resources law or regulation or law against bribery or corruption, including but not limited to the federal Foreign Corrupt Practices Act; new text end new text begin (6) in the last 15 years, has been caused to pay civil or administrative sanctions or fines or has otherwise been found civilly liable for willful or repeated violations of state, federal, Tribal, or foreign laws or regulations relating to occupational safety and health; new text end new text begin (7) is found by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to be a subsidiary or affiliate of a business described under clauses (1) to (6); new text end new text begin (8) is found by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to have common ownership with a business described under clauses (1) to (6); new text end new text begin (9) is found by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to hold, or previously to have held, a beneficial business interest amounting to more than five percent of the equity in or debt liability in a business that: new text end new text begin (i) is required to be listed on the applicant's disclosure statement under subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (ii) is a person described under clauses (1) to (6); or new text end new text begin (10) is found by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency to employ as an officer or director a person who is described under clauses (1) to (6). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency must, within six months of a person submitting a disclosure statement under subdivision 1, determine whether the commissioner is prohibited from conducting environmental review or from issuing, renewing, assigning, approving, modifying, amending, or transferring a permit, license, or lease under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Other law. new text end new text begin This section must be complied with notwithstanding any provision of law that limits the time within which the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency must act or that deems nonaction by a certain date as constituting final action for purposes of commencing judicial review proceedings. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Failure to disclose. new text end new text begin The commissioner and the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency are prohibited from conducting environmental review relating to a proposed nonferrous sulfide ore project and must not issue, renew, assign, approve, modify, amend, or transfer a permit, license, or lease needed to mine nonferrous sulfide ore under this chapter or other chapters administered by the commissioner or the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency subject to subdivision 2, paragraph (a), if a person fails to disclose or falsely states any information required under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to proposed nonferrous sulfide ore projects that have begun, but not completed, environmental review on or before that date and to permits granted, renewed, modified, or amended on or after that date. new text end